Washington statutes.
RCW 1.16.080

"Person"—Construction of "association," "unincorporated association," and "person, firm, or corporation" to include a limited liability company.

(1) The term "person" may be construed to include the United States, this state, or any state or territory, or any public or private corporation or limited liability company, as well as an individual.

(2) Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the terms "association," "unincorporated association," and "person, firm, or corporation" or substantially identical terms shall, without limiting the application of any term to any other type of legal entity, be construed to include a limited liability company.

[ 1996 c 231 s 1; 1891 c 23 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 964; 1857 p 46 s 1; 1854 p 99 s 134; RRS s 146.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section is a part of 1891 c 23 s 1. The introductory phrase of that section provides: "The following provisions relative to the construction of statutes shall be rules of construction and shall constitute a part of the code of procedure of this state:".

Criminal proceedings, person defined: RCW 9A.04.110.

Declaratory judgments, person defined: RCW 7.24.130.

Eminent domain by cities, person defined: RCW 8.12.020.

Notice to alien property custodian, person defined: RCW 4.28.340.

Wrongful death, person defined: RCW 4.20.005.